Massachusetts, session 194th, H4171.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 271 of the acts of 1933 is hereby amended by striking out section 7,
as most recently amended by section 1 of chapter 297 of the acts of 1992, and inserting in place
thereof the following section:
Section 7. Any vacancy in the full number of town meeting members from any precinct,
whether arise from a failure of the registered voters thereof to elect, or from any other cause,
may be filled, until the next annual election, by the remaining members of the precinct from
among the registered voters thereof. Notice of any vacancy shall promptly be given by the Town
Clerk to the members from the precinct in which the vacancy or vacancies exist and he/she shall
call a special meeting of such members for the purpose of filling any vacancy. He/She shall
cause to be mailed to every such member a notice specifying the object, time and place of the
meeting with the notice of the time and place at which representative town meetings are to be
held as set forth in section three. At the said special meeting a majority of the members from
of 2

such precinct shall constitute a quorum, and they shall elect from their own numbers a chairman
and a clerk. The choice to fill any vacancy shall be by ballot and a majority of the votes cast shall
be required for a choice. The chairman and clerk shall count the ballots and shall make a
certificate of the choice and forthwith file the same with the Town Clerk, together with a written
acceptance by the member or members so chosen, who shall thereupon be deemed elected and
qualified as a town meeting member or members, subject to the right of all the town meeting
members to judge of the election and qualifications of the members as set forth in section three.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2